Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-9207
Business entity acting as public adjuster; license; application; qualifications; fee; director; powers.

(1) A business entity acting as a public adjuster in this state is required to obtain a public adjuster license and shall make application to the director on the uniform business entity application and declare under penalty of denial, suspension, or revocation of the license that the statements made in the application are true, correct, and complete to the best of the knowledge and belief of such entity. Before approving an application for a business entity public adjuster license, the director shall find that the applicant:

(a) Has paid the business entity licensing fee, not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars, prescribed by the director; and

(b) Has designated a resident public adjuster or a nonresident public adjuster licensed pursuant to the Public Adjusters Licensing Act to be responsible for compliance with the insurance laws, rules, and regulations of this state for such business entity.

(2) The director may require any documents reasonably necessary to verify the information contained in any application submitted pursuant to this section.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 7.